Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2222
Funding eligibility; activities and services enumerated.

Activities and services eligible for funding under the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act and an approved plan are:

(1) Those agency functions and services necessary to carry out the agency's responsibilities under the act and in its plan, including, but not limited to, administration, management, information, referral, counseling, program evaluation, needs assessment, research, training, program development, outreach, coordination, advocacy, planning, technical assistance, contracting, and promotion; and

(2) Those community aging services necessary to promote, restore, or support self-sufficiency for older individuals, including (a) congregate activities which (i) are organized and provided on a group basis and delivered in or through a senior service center, (ii) have as their purpose to serve older individuals as a group, and (iii) carry out the goals of the act and (b) individual services which (i) are organized and provided on a one-to-one basis in home or through a senior service center, (ii) have as their purpose to serve an individual or family need, and (iii) carry out the goals of the act.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 22;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 24.